Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.120

Director—Powers—Enforcement of chapter.

The director or the director's designee may, at his or her discretion, take such actions as provided for in Titles *30, 32, and 33 RCW, and chapters 31.12, 31.04, and 19.146 RCW, to enforce, investigate, or examine persons covered by this chapter.

[ 2008 c 108 s 13.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.